Louisiana, session 2026, SB308.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 38:2242(A) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 38:2242(G),
(H), and (I) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2242. Claimant defined; filing of sworn statements of amounts due; payment by
contracting authority
A. "Claimant", as used in this Chapter, means any person to whom money is
due pursuant to a contract or noncontractual relationship with the owner or a
contractor or subcontractor for doing work, performing labor, or furnishing materials
or supplies for the construction, alteration, or repair of any public works, or for
transporting and delivering such materials or supplies to the site of the job by a for-
hire carrier, or for furnishing oil, gas, electricity, or other materials or supplies for
Page 1 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-526 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 308
use in machines used in the construction, alteration, or repair of any public works,
including persons to whom money is due for the lease or rental of movable property
used at the site of the immovable and leased to the owner, contractor, or
subcontractor by written contract, and including registered or certified surveyors or
engineers or consulting engineers, or licensed architects, or their professional
subconsultants employed by the owner or by the contractor or subcontractor in
connection with the building of any public work.
* * *
G.(1) Any claimant who does not have a direct contractual relationship
with the contractor but intends to preserve the right to assert a claim under this
Part against the bond furnished pursuant to R.S. 38:2241 et seq., or against
unexpended contract funds shall serve a written "Notice to Contractor and
Public Entity" in accordance with this Subsection.
(2) The notice shall be served on both the contractor and the public
entity not later than forty-five days after the claimant first furnishes labor,
services, materials, or equipment to the public work.
(3) The notice shall state with substantial accuracy:
(a) The name and address of the claimant.
(b) The name of the contractor.
(c) The name of the person with whom the claimant has contracted.
(d) A general description of the labor, services, materials, or equipment
to be furnished.
(e) A statement that the claimant intends to look to the bond furnished
pursuant to this Part and to any unexpended contract funds for payment in the
event it is not timely paid.
(4) Failure of a claimant who does not have a direct contractual
relationship with the contractor to timely serve the notice required by this
Subsection shall preclude that claimant from asserting any claim or privilege
under this Part against the contractor, the surety on the bond, or the public
Page 2 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-526 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 308
entity, except as to work, labor, services, materials, or equipment furnished
prior to August 1, 2026.
H.(1)In addition to the notice required by Subsection G of this Section,
any claimant who does not have a direct contractual relationship with the
contractor and who intends to preserve the right to assert a claim under this
Part for unpaid labor, services, materials, or equipment furnished in a
particular calendar month shall also serve a "Monthly Notice of Nonpayment"
in accordance with this Subsection.
(2) For each calendar month in which the claimant furnishes labor,
services, materials, or equipment to the public work for which payment has not
been received within thirty days after payment is due under the claimant's
contract, the claimant shall serve a monthly notice on the contractor, the public
entity, and the surety on the bond.
(3) The monthly notice shall be served not later than seventy-five days
after the last day of the calendar month in which the unpaid labor, services,
materials, or equipment were furnished.
(4) The monthly notice shall state with substantial accuracy all of the
following:
(a) Project and public entity.
(b) Name of the contractor.
(c) Name of the person with whom the claimant has contracted.
(d) The calendar month or months to which the notice relates.
(e) Total amount claimed as unpaid for such month or months.
(f) Claimant has not been paid the amount and that failure to pay may
result in a claim against the bond and unexpended contract funds.
(5) A claimant who fails to timely serve a monthly notice as required by
this Subsection shall not be entitled to assert any claim or privilege under this
Part for the labor, services, materials, or equipment furnished during the
calendar month or months to which the untimely notice relates, but such failure
Page 3 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-526 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 308
shall not affect rights preserved as to other calendar months for which timely
notice was given.
(6) Nothing in this Subsection shall be construed to diminish or impair
any notice requirement imposed upon a materialman by any other Subsection
of this Section. However, compliance with this Subsection shall be deemed
compliance with any duplicative monthly notice of nonpayment requirement
applicable to materialmen who do not have a direct contractual relationship
with the contractor.
I.(1) Any notice required by Subsection G or H of this Section shall be
served by one or more of the following methods:
(a) Registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the last
known business address of the contractor, public entity, or surety, as applicable.
(b) Commercial delivery service which provides written confirmation of
delivery.
(c) Electronic mail directed to an address which the contractor, public
entity, or surety has expressly designated in the contract, in the bond, or in a
written notice filed of record with the public entity for receipt of notices under
this Part, provided that the sender retains proof of successful electronic
transmission.
(2) Service by any of the methods provided in Paragraph (1) of this
Subsection shall be effective upon deposit for mailing, delivery to a commercial
carrier, or successful electronic transmission, as the case may be.
(3) Nothing herein shall preclude the parties from agreeing in writing to
additional or alternative methods of service that afford actual notice.